District of Columbia statutes.
34-1257.02

Operation and construction of system; general requirements.

(a)

A cable operator shall construct, operate, and maintain the cable system subject to the supervision and regulatory oversight of the Office and in full compliance with the laws and regulations of the District and federal government, including the Electrical Code approved pursuant to Chapter 14 of Title 6; Department of Public Works Standard Specification for Highway and Structures; National Electrical Code, and National Electrical Safety Code.

(b)

A cable operator shall exercise its best efforts to design, construct, operate, and maintain the system at all times so that signals carried are delivered to subscribers without material degradation in quality.

History

Aug. 21, 1982, D.C. Law 4-142, § 702
as added Oct. 9, 2002, D.C. Law 14-193, § 2(b), 49 DCR 7334